Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-204.04
Bingo card monitoring device, defined.

Bingo card monitoring device means a technological aid which allows a bingo player to automatically or manually enter bingo numbers or song titles, musical artists, or music genres as they are announced at a bingo occasion and which enters or otherwise conceals those numbers or song titles, musical artists, or music genres on bingo cards which are electronically stored in and displayed on the device. A bingo card monitoring device shall not mean or include any device (1) into which currency, coins, or tokens may be inserted or from which currency, coins, tokens, or any receipt for monetary value can be dispensed or (2) which, once provided to a bingo player, is capable of communicating with any other bingo card monitoring device or any other form of electronic device or computer, except that such device may communicate with its host system.

Laws 2003, LB 429, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB775, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 13.
July 1, 2026